Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1132.
do enact as follows:AB1132,11Section 1. 301.046 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,2,22301.046 (3) (cm) The prisoner is not awaiting execution of a death sentence.AB1132,23Section 2. 301.048 (2) (am) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,3,34301.048 (2) (am) 2. He or she is a prisoner serving a felony sentence for a 1felony that is not punishable by death or by life imprisonment and the department 2directs him or her to participate in the program. This subdivision does not apply to 3a prisoner serving a bifurcated sentence imposed under s. 973.01.AB1132,34Section 3. 302.11 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,3,105302.11 (1) The warden or superintendent shall keep a record of the conduct of 6each inmate, specifying each infraction of the rules. Except as provided in subs. 7(1g), (1m), (1q), (1w), (1z), and (7), each inmate is entitled to mandatory release on 8parole by the department. The mandatory release date is established at two-thirds 9of the sentence. Any calculations under this subsection or sub. (1q) (b) or (2) (b) 10resulting in fractions of a day shall be rounded in the inmate’s favor to a whole day.AB1132,411Section 4. 302.11 (1w) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,3,1312302.11 (1w) An inmate who is sentenced to death or life imprisonment under 13s. 973.0145 is not entitled to mandatory release on parole under this section.AB1132,514Section 5. 302.114 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,3,1915302.114 (1) An inmate is subject to this section if he or she is serving a life 16sentence imposed under s. 973.014 (1g) (a) 1. or 2. An inmate serving a life sentence 17under s. 939.62 (2m) or 973.014 (1g) (a) 3. or awaiting execution of a death sentence 18under s. 973.0147 is not eligible for release to extended supervision under this 19section.AB1132,620Section 6. 303.065 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,3,2321303.065 (1) (b) 2. A person serving a life sentence under s. 939.62 (2m) (c) or 22973.014 (1) (c) or (1g) (a) 3. or awaiting execution of a death sentence under s. 23973.0147 may not be considered for work release.AB1132,71Section 7. 304.02 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,4,52304.02 (5) Notwithstanding subs. (1) to (3), a prisoner who is serving a life 3sentence under s. 939.62 (2m) (c) or 973.014 (1) (c) or (1g) or who is awaiting 4execution of a death sentence under s. 973.0147 is not eligible for release to parole 5supervision under this section.AB1132,86Section 8. 304.06 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,4,227304.06 (1) (b) Except as provided in s. 961.49 (2), 1999 stats., sub. (1m) or (1t), 8or s. 302.045 (3), 302.05 (3) (b), 973.01 (6), or 973.0135, the parole commission may 9parole an inmate of the Wisconsin state prisons or any felon or any person serving 10at least one year or more in a county house of correction or a county reforestation 11camp organized under s. 303.07, when he or she has served 25 percent of the 12sentence imposed for the offense, or 6 months, whichever is greater. Except as 13provided in sub. (1t) or s. 939.62 (2m) (c) or 973.014 (1) (b) or (c), (1g) or (2), the 14parole commission may parole an inmate serving a life term when he or she has 15served 20 years, as modified by the formula under s. 302.11 (1) and subject to 16extension under s. 302.11 (1q) and (2), if applicable. The person serving the life 17term shall be given credit for time served prior to sentencing under s. 973.155, 18including good time under s. 973.155 (4). The secretary may grant special action 19parole releases under s. 304.02. The department or the parole commission shall not 20provide any convicted offender or other person sentenced to the department’s 21custody any parole eligibility or evaluation until the person has been confined at 22least 60 days following sentencing.AB1132,923Section 9. 304.06 (1t) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,5,21304.06 (1t) The parole commission may not parole an inmate who is 2sentenced under s. 973.0145 to life imprisonment or to death.AB1132,103Section 10. 304.071 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,5,64304.071 (2) If a prisoner is not eligible for parole under s. 961.49 (2), 1999 5stats., or s. 304.06 (1t), 939.62 (2m) (c), 973.01 (6), 973.014 (1) (c) or (1g) or 973.032 6(5), he or she is not eligible for parole under this section.AB1132,117Section 11. 939.22 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,5,98939.22 (7) “Crime that is punishable by death” means a felony crime for which 9the possible penalties include death and life imprisonment.AB1132,1210Section 12. 939.50 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,5,1311939.50 (3) (a) For a Class A felony, life imprisonment, except that the penalty 12for a violation of s. 948.02 (1) (am) or (b) or 948.025 (1) (a) is death or life 13imprisonment.AB1132,1314Section 13. 939.60 of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,5,1715939.60 Felony and misdemeanor defined. A crime that is punishable by 16death or punishable by imprisonment in the Wisconsin state prisons is a felony. 17Every other crime is a misdemeanor.AB1132,1418Section 14. 939.619 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,6,219939.619 (2) If a person has one or more prior convictions for a serious violent 20crime or a crime that is punishable by death or punishable by life imprisonment and 21subsequently commits a serious violent crime, the court shall impose a bifurcated 22sentence under s. 973.01. The term of confinement in prison portion of a bifurcated 23sentence imposed under this subsection may not be less than 5 years, but otherwise 1the penalties for the crime apply, subject to any applicable penalty enhancement. 2The court may not place the defendant on probation.AB1132,153Section 15. 939.62 (2m) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,6,74939.62 (2m) (c) If the actor is a persistent repeater and the actor is not 5sentenced to death under s. 973.0145, the term of imprisonment for the felony for 6which the persistent repeater presently is being sentenced under ch. 973 is life 7imprisonment without the possibility of parole or extended supervision.AB1132,168Section 16. 939.63 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,6,129939.63 (1) (b) If the maximum term of imprisonment for a felony is more than 105 years or is a life term imprisonment or the felony is a crime that is punishable by 11death, the maximum term of imprisonment for the felony may be increased by not 12more than 5 years.AB1132,1713Section 17. 961.335 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,6,1714961.335 (1m) Notwithstanding sub. (1), upon the application of the secretary 15of corrections for a permit to obtain a controlled substance for purposes of an 16execution under s. 973.0147, the controlled substances board shall issue a permit 17under this section.AB1132,1818Section 18. 967.02 (1v) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,6,2019967.02 (1v) “Crime that is punishable by death” has the meaning given in s. 20939.22 (7).AB1132,1921Section 19. 971.01 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB1132,7,222971.01 (3) If the information charges an offense under s. 948.02 (1) (am) or (b) 1or 948.025 (1) (a), the information shall contain a statement as to whether the state 2seeks a sentence of death for the offense.AB1132,203Section 20. 971.17 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1132,7,84971.17 (1) (c) Felonies punishable by death or life imprisonment. If a 5defendant is found not guilty by reason of mental disease or mental defect of a felony 6crime that is punishable by death or punishable by life imprisonment, the 7commitment period specified by the court may be life, subject to termination under 8sub. (5).AB1132,219Section 21. 972.03 of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1132 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1132 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1132 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1132 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1132: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting